New.aff
PFX S 0 akataga .
PFX S 0 akataka .
PFX S 0 akatabu .
PFX S 0 akatalu .
PFX S 0 akataku .
PFX S 0 akatatu .
PFX S 0 tebun [^lmn]
PFX S l tebund l.[^mn]
PFX S l tebunn l.[mn]
PFX S w tebump [w]
PFX S 0 tebumu .
PFX S 0 tebuba .
PFX S 0 tebugu .
PFX S 0 tebugi .
PFX S 0 tebuzi .
PFX S 0 tebuki .
PFX S 0 tebubi .
PFX S 0 tebuli .
PFX S 0 tebuga .
PFX S 0 tebuka .
PFX S 0 tebubu .
PFX S 0 tebulu .
PFX S 0 tebuku .
PFX S 0 tebutu .
PFX S 0 obutan [^lmn]
PFX S l obutand l.[^mn]
PFX S l obutann l.[mn]
PFX S w obutamp [w]
PFX S 0 obutamu .
PFX S 0 obutaba .
PFX S 0 obutagu .
PFX S 0 obutagi .
PFX S 0 obutazi .
PFX S 0 obutaki .
PFX S 0 obutabi .
PFX S 0 obutali .
PFX S 0 obutaga .
PFX S 0 obutaka .
PFX S 0 obutabu .
PFX S 0 obutalu .
PFX S 0 obutaku .
PFX S 0 obutatu .
PFX S 0 telun [^lmn]
PFX S l telund l.[^mn]
PFX S l telunn l.[mn]
PFX S w telump [w]
PFX S 0 telumu .
PFX S 0 teluba .
PFX S 0 telugu .
PFX S 0 telugi .
PFX S 0 teluzi .
PFX S 0 teluki .
PFX S 0 telubi .
PFX S 0 teluli .
PFX S 0 teluga .
PFX S 0 teluka .
PFX S 0 telubu .
PFX S 0 telulu .
PFX S 0 teluku .
PFX S 0 telutu .
PFX S 0 olutan [^lmn]
PFX S l olutand l.[^mn]
PFX S l olutann l.[mn]
PFX S w olutamp [w]
PFX S 0 olutamu .
PFX S 0 olutaba .
PFX S 0 olutagu .
PFX S 0 olutagi .
PFX S 0 olutazi .
PFX S 0 olutaki .
PFX S 0 olutabi .
PFX S 0 olutali .
PFX S 0 olutaga .
PFX S 0 olutaka .
PFX S 0 olutabu .
PFX S 0 olutalu .
PFX S 0 olutaku .
PFX S 0 olutatu .
PFX S 0 tekun [^lmn]
PFX S l tekund l.[^mn]
PFX S l tekunn l.[mn]
PFX S w tekump [w]
PFX S 0 tekumu .
PFX S 0 tekuba .
PFX S 0 tekugu .
PFX S 0 tekugi .
PFX S 0 tekuzi .
PFX S 0 tekuki .
PFX S 0 tekubi .
PFX S 0 tekuli .
PFX S 0 tekuga .
PFX S 0 tekuka .
PFX S 0 tekubu .
PFX S 0 tekulu .
PFX S 0 tekuku .
PFX S 0 tekutu .
PFX S 0 okutan [^lmn]
PFX S l okutand l.[^mn]
PFX S l okutann l.[mn]
PFX S w okutamp [w]
PFX S 0 okutamu .
PFX S 0 okutaba .
PFX S 0 okutagu .
PFX S 0 okutagi .
PFX S 0 okutazi .
PFX S 0 okutaki .
PFX S 0 okutabi .
PFX S 0 okutali .
PFX S 0 okutaga .
PFX S 0 okutaka .
PFX S 0 okutabu .
PFX S 0 okutalu .
PFX S 0 okutaku .
PFX S 0 okutatu .
PFX S 0 tetun [^lmn]
PFX S l tetund l.[^mn]
PFX S l tetunn l.[mn]
PFX S w tetump [w]
PFX S 0 tetumu .
PFX S 0 tetuba .
PFX S 0 tetugu .
PFX S 0 tetugi .
PFX S 0 tetuzi .
PFX S 0 tetuki .
PFX S 0 tetubi .
PFX S 0 tetuli .
PFX S 0 tetuga .
PFX S 0 tetuka .
PFX S 0 tetubu .
PFX S 0 tetulu .
PFX S 0 tetuku .
PFX S 0 tetutu .
PFX S 0 otutan [^lmn]
PFX S l otutand l.[^mn]
PFX S l otutann l.[mn]
PFX S w otutamp [w]
PFX S 0 otutamu .
PFX S 0 otutaba .
PFX S 0 otutagu .
PFX S 0 otutagi .
PFX S 0 otutazi .
PFX S 0 otutaki .
PFX S 0 otutabi .
PFX S 0 otutali .
PFX S 0 otutaga .
PFX S 0 otutaka .
PFX S 0 otutabu .
PFX S 0 otutalu .
PFX S 0 otutaku .
PFX S 0 otutatu .
